Alaska, session 34, HB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.43.085(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) A person enrolled as a student in good standing in a state-supported 06 [STATE SUPPORTED] educational institution in this state is entitled to a waiver of 07 undergraduate tuition and fees if 08 (1) the person was the spouse or dependent child of a bona fide 09 resident of the state who was 10 (A) [(1)] a member of the armed services and who died in the 11 line of duty or who died as a result of injuries sustained while in the line of 12 duty for the state or federal government or who was listed by the United States 13 Department of Defense as a prisoner of war or as missing in action; or 14 (B) [(2)] a peace officer or a member of a fire department who 01 died from an act arising out of and in the course of 02 (i) [(A)] employment as a peace officer or a firefighter; 03 or 04 (ii) [(B)] duties as a volunteer firefighter; or 05 (2) the person is the spouse or dependent child of a bona fide 06 resident of the state who 07 (A) was a member of the armed services and received a 08 rating of permanently and totally disabled from the federal government as 09 a result of injuries sustained while in the line of duty for the federal 10 government; or 11 (B) has been determined under AS 23.30.180 to have a 12 permanent total disability as a result of 13 (i) an act arising out of and in the course of 14 employment as a peace officer or a firefighter; 15 (ii) an act arising out of and in the course of duties 16 as a volunteer firefighter; or 17 (iii) injuries sustained while in the line of duty for 18 the state government while serving as a member of the armed 19 services. 20 * Sec. 2. AS 14.43.085(b)(2) is amended to read: 21 (2) "dependent child" means a person who was a dependent of a peace 22 officer or of a member of the armed services or a fire department at the time of the 23 peace officer's or member's death or at the time of the incident that resulted in the 24 peace officer's or member's permanent total disability, and who is 25 (A) the peace officer's or member's natural or adopted child; 26 (B) a child in relation to whom the deceased or disabled armed 27 services member, firefighter, or peace officer stood in loco parentis for at least 28 three years before the peace officer's or member's death or disability; 29 (C) the peace officer's or member's stepchild; or 30 (D) the peace officer's or member's acknowledged illegitimate 31 child; 01 * Sec. 3. AS 14.43.085(b)(7) is amended to read: 02 (7) "spouse" means a person who was married to a peace officer or to a 03 member of the armed services or a fire department at the time of the peace officer's or 04 member's death or at the time of the incident that resulted in the peace officer's or 05 member's permanent total disability. 06 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY. A waiver of undergraduate tuition and fees for a person permitted 09 under AS 14.43.085(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, AS 14.43.085(b)(2), as amended by 10 sec. 2 of this Act, and AS 14.43.085(b)(7), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, applies to tuition 11 and fees accrued by the person for an academic term beginning on or after the effective date 12 of this Act. 13 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.